District of Columbia statutes.
16-576

Lapse of attachment upon resignation or dismissal of employee.

If a judgment debtor resigns or is dismissed from his employment while an attachment upon his wages is wholly or partly unsatisfied, the attachment shall lapse and no further deduction may be made thereon unless the judgment debtor is reinstated or reemployed within 90 days after the resignation or dismissal.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 556, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

History

1981 Ed., § 16-576.
1973 Ed., § 16-576.

Prior Codifications